Vermont, session 2025-2026, H179.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Findings and Intent * * *
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Recent challenges faced by the Agency of Education, including
compliance issues with federal reporting requirements, highlight a need for
stronger leadership and structural reform. The Agency of Education is now
seen as a political tool of the Governor. With a two-year Governor term,
Vermont needs a Department of Education and Commissioner of Education
that report directly to a neutral State Board of Education with a focus on
leading Vermont to the best educational system in the United States.
(2) Concerns about transparency and effectiveness have eroded public
confidence in the Agency of Education. Transitioning back to a department
aligns with historical norms and best practices for state education governance.
(3) A department structure allows for greater focus on addressing
critical issues such as academic achievement gaps, mental health support, and
equitable resource distribution.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to increase
accountability, improve operational efficiency, and strengthen public
confidence in Vermont’s education governance by transitioning the Agency of
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 3 of 14
Education to the Department of Education, lead by a Commissioner of
Education that reports directly to the State Board of Education.
* * * Department of Education * * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 164 is amended to read:
§ 164. STATE BOARD; GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES
The State Board shall engage local school board members and the broader
education community and, consistent with the provisions of this title, its own
rules, and rules adopted by the Secretary, establish and regularly update a long-
term strategic vision for the delivery of educational services in Vermont;
advise the General Assembly, the Governor, and the Secretary of Education on
high-priority educational policies and issues as they arise; and act in
accordance with legislative mandates, including the adoption of rules and
executing special assignments. In addition to other specified duties, the Board
shall have supervision over and management of the Department of Education
and the public school system, except as otherwise provided, and shall:
* * *
(4) Biennially cause to be prepared a recommended budget for all
money to be expended by the Department of Education.
* * *
(10) Establish an information clearinghouse and accessible database to
help districts share information about educational programs and practices that
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 4 of 14
improve student performance and well-being. Educational programs and
practices include those designed to create and sustain a safe learning
environment.
* * *
(17) Report annually on the condition of education statewide and on a
supervisory union and school district basis. The report shall include
information on attainment of standards for student performance adopted under
subdivision (9) of this section,; number and types of complaints of hazing,
harassment, or bullying made pursuant to chapter 9, subchapter 5 of this title
and responses to the complaints,; financial resources and expenditures,; and
community social indicators. The report shall be organized and presented in a
way that is easily understandable by the general public and that enables each
school, school district, and supervisory union to determine its strengths and
weaknesses. To the extent consistent with State and federal privacy laws and
regulations, data on hazing, harassment, or bullying incidents shall be
disaggregated by incident type, including disaggregation by ethnic groups,
racial groups, religious groups, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity,
disability status, and English language learner status. The Secretary
Commissioner shall use the information in the report to determine whether
students in each school, school district, and supervisory union are provided
educational opportunities substantially equal to those provided in other
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 5 of 14
schools, school districts, and supervisory unions pursuant to subsection 165(b)
of this title.
* * *
(19) Develop, in consultation with the Secretary of State, and make
available to school boards, sample ballot language for items that may be voted
on by Australian ballot and for which no statutory language exists.
* * *
(21) Report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on the
progress the Board has made on the development of education policy for the
State. [Repealed.]
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 163 is amended to read:
§ 163. STAFF; MEETINGS
(a) The office of the Board shall be supported by adequate staff, who shall
report to the Board the office of the Commissioner of Education.
* * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. chapter 5 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 5. SECRETARY COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION
Subchapter 1. Secretary Commissioner of Education
§ 211. APPOINTMENT; REPORTS
(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor, the State Board shall employ a
competent chief executive officer and secretary of the Board who shall have
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 6 of 14
had special training and experience in educational work and who shall be
called the Commissioner of Education. The Commissioner shall be appointed
for an indefinite term and shall be subject to removal upon the majority vote of
the entire Board.
(b) The Commissioner at all times and in such detail as the Board directs
shall make reports to the Board concerning the public educational system,
together with such recommendations as the Commissioner deems proper for
the promotion of the educational interests of the State.
§ 212. SECRETARY’S COMMISSIONER’S DUTIES GENERALLY
The Secretary Commissioner shall execute those policies adopted by the
State Board in the legal exercise of its powers and shall:
* * *
(14) Annually, communicate to each superintendent a list of information
that a supervisory union, a school board, a school district, a school, a school
district employee, or a supervisory union employee is required under State or
federal law to make available to the electorate, community members, parents,
or students. It is the intent of this subdivision that the Secretary Commissioner
shall make a good faith effort to compile a complete list of the information to
be made available. Due to the difficult nature of compiling such a list, it is
also the intent that failure to include relevant information on the list shall not
constitute grounds for an action against the Secretary Commissioner.
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 7 of 14
* * *
(19) Establish an information clearinghouse and accessible database to
help districts share information about educational programs and practices that
improve student performance. Educational programs and practices include
those designed to create and sustain a safe learning environment. [Repealed.]
(20) Develop, in consultation with the Secretary of State, and make
available to school boards sample ballot language for issues that may be
decided by Australian ballot and for which no statutory language exists.
[Repealed.]
(21) Prepare a budget for the Agency and submit it to the Governor after
review by the State Board. [Repealed.]
(22) Annually, prior to September 1, present the Governor’s education
policy priorities to the State Board. [Repealed.]
§ 213. DEPUTY SECRETARIES COMMISSIONERS AND HELPING
TEACHERS
The Secretary Board shall employ such number of deputy secretaries
commissioners and such number of competent helping teachers as he or she it
deems necessary. It shall determine the tenure of office of the deputy
commissioners and helping teachers and fix the compensation of the helping
teachers, which shall be paid by the State. The Board may remove such staff
as the best interests of the schools from time to time may require.
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 8 of 14
* * *
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 212 is amended to read:
§ 212. DEPARTMENTS CREATED
The following administrative departments are hereby created, through the
instrumentality of which the Governor, under the Constitution, shall exercise
such functions as are by law assigned to each department respectively:
* * *
(6) The Department of Education
* * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 256(b) is amended to read:
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all secretaries of State
agencies and all commissioners of State departments, other than the
Commissioner of Education, shall take office only with the advice and consent
of the Senate except in the case of an appointment to fill a vacancy when the
General Assembly is not in session in which case the appointee may take office
subject to the provisions of section 257 of this title.
Sec. 7. REPEAL
3 V.S.A. chapter 49 is repealed.
Sec. 8. COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION; TRANSITION; POWERS
AND DUTIES; REPORT
(a) Transition. On January 1, 2026:
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 9 of 14
(1) the Commissioner of Education shall assume all powers, duties,
rights, and responsibilities of the Secretary of Education; provided, however,
that if a Commissioner appointed by the State Board has not assumed office on
or before January 1, 2026, then the Secretary or acting Secretary of the Agency
on that date shall continue to perform the duties until the day on which the
Commissioner assumes office, but shall report to the Board and not the
Governor; and
(2) the Department of Education shall assume all the powers, duties,
rights, and responsibilities of the Agency of Education.
(b) Reports.
(1) On or before November 15, 2026, the Department of Education shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Education with
a detailed update on the transition from the Agency of Education to the
Department of Education. The report shall include:
(A) a Department-wide organizational chart with vacancies noted and
a plan for fulling any such vacancies as well as a plan for accounting for the
duties of vacant positions; and
(B) any recommendations for legislative action to further achieve the
General Assembly’s legislative intent under this act.
(2) On or before November 15, 2026, the State Board of Education shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Education with
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 10 of 14
a detailed update on the transition from the Agency of Education to the
Department of Education, from the State Board’s perspective. The report shall
include any recommendations for legislative action to further achieve the
General Assembly’s legislative intent under this act.
Sec. 9. LEGISLATIVE COUNSEL; PREPARATION OF A DRAFT BILL
On or before January 15, 2026, the Office of Legislative Counsel shall
prepare and submit a draft bill to the House and Senate Committees on
Education that makes statutory amendments of a technical nature and identifies
all statutory sections that the General Assembly shall amend substantively to
effect the intent of the act.
* * * Composition of the State Board of Education * * *
Sec. 10. 16 V.S.A. § 161 is amended to read:
§ 161. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION; APPOINTMENT OF
MEMBERS; TERM; VACANCY
(a) The State Board shall consist of ten 11 members. Two of the members
shall be secondary students, each appointed by the Governor, one of whom
shall be a full member and the other of whom shall be a junior member who
may not vote. All Student members shall be appointed by the Governor with
the advice and consent of the Senate. In the appointment of the nonstudent
members, priority shall be given to the selection of persons with a
demonstrated commitment to ensuring quality education for Vermont students.
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 11 of 14
To the extent possible, the members shall represent the State’s geographic,
gender, racial, and ethnic diversity. The Secretary Commissioner shall serve
on the State Board as a nonvoting member. The remaining eight voting
members shall require the advice and consent of the Senate and shall be
appointed as follows:
(1) one member shall be a public school central office administrator,
appointed by the Vermont Superintendents Association;
(2) one member shall be a public school administrator, appointed by the
Vermont Principals’ Association;
(3) one member shall be a public school board member, appointed by
the Vermont School Boards Association;
(4) one member shall be a public school teacher, appointed by the
Vermont National Education Association;
(5) one member shall be an independent school administrator or teacher,
appointed by the Vermont Independent Schools Association; and
(6) three members shall be at large, appointed as follows:
(A) one member appointed by the Governor;
(B) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(C) one member appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees.
(b)(1) Upon the expiration of the respective terms of those members of the
Board previously appointed, excluding the student members, the Governor the
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 12 of 14
appointing authority that made the initial appointment to the expired term
shall, biennially in the month of February with the advice and consent of the
Senate, appoint members for terms of six years. The terms shall begin March
1 of the year in which the appointments are made. A member serving a term of
six years shall not be eligible for reappointment for successive terms.
(2) In the event of any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Board, the Governor appointing authority that made the initial appointment to
the vacated term shall fill the vacancy with a qualified person whose
appointment shall be for the unexpired portion of the term.
(3) Biennially, the Board shall choose a member of the Board to be its
chair.
(4) Annually, using an application process that is open and accessible to
all eligible students, the Governor shall appoint a Vermont secondary school
student who will continue to be a secondary student for at least two years
following taking office, to serve on the State Board for two years, beginning on
July 1 of the year of appointment. The student member shall not vote during
the first year and shall be a full and voting member during the second year of
his or her the student’s term.
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 13 of 14
Sec. 11. TRANSITION PERIOD APPOINTMENTS; STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION
(a) Members currently serving on the State Board of Education may
continue to serve for the duration of the term to which they were appointed.
(b) On or before September 1, 2025, the Vermont National Education
Association shall appoint one public school teacher member.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2025, as terms of currently serving members
expire, appointments of successors shall be made in accordance with the
qualifications, considerations, and appointment authority required under 16
V.S.A. § 161 and shall be made in the following order:
(1) For the terms expiring on February 28, 2027, one appointment shall
be made by the Vermont Superintendents Association, one appointment shall
be made by the Vermont Principals’ Association, and one appointment shall be
made by the Vermont School Boards Association.
(2) For the term expiring on February 28, 2028, one appointment shall
be made by the Vermont Independent Schools Association.
(3) For the term expiring on February 28, 2029, one at large
appointment shall be made by the Governor.
(4) For the term expiring on June 30, 2030, one appointment shall be
made by the Speaker of the House.
VT LEG #380288 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.179
2025 Page 14 of 14
(5) For the term expiring on February 28, 3031, one appointment shall
be made by the Senate Committee on Committees.
(d) After each appointing authority has made its initial transition period
appointments under this section, all appointments shall be made by the
appointing authority that made the initial appointment to the vacated or expired
term in accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 161.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380288 v.1